North Carolina, session 2025, HB186.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REQUIRE PLEDGE OF ALLEGIANCE TO BE SCHEDULED AT THE
BEGINNING OF THE SCHOOL DAY
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-47(29a) reads as rewritten:
"(29a) To Require the Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags, and to
Require the Recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance. – Local boards of
education shall adopt policies to (i) require the display of the United States
and North Carolina flags in each classroom, when available, (ii) require that
recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance be scheduled on a daily basis, Pledge of
Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4, be scheduled on a daily basis within
one hour of the beginning of the instructional day, and (iii) provide
age-appropriate instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag
and the Pledge of Allegiance. These policies shall not compel any person to
stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated
or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C(23), as enacted by S.L. 2023-10, reads as
rewritten:
"(23) The Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags and the Recitation
of the Pledge of Allegiance. – The board of trustees shall adopt policies to (i)
require the display of the United States and North Carolina flags in each
classroom when available, (ii) require that recitation of the Pledge of
Allegiance be scheduled on a daily basis, Pledge of Allegiance, as codified in
4 U.S.C. § 4, be scheduled on a daily basis within one hour of the beginning
of the instructional day, and (iii) provide age-appropriate instruction on the
meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. These
policies shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the
Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags
shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-218.80 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.80. Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation
of the Pledge of Allegiance.
*H186-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
A charter school shall (i) display the United States and North Carolina flags in each classroom
when available, (ii) require the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, Pledge of
Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4, be scheduled on a daily basis within one hour of the
beginning of the instructional day, and (iii) provide age-appropriate instruction on the meaning
and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. A charter school shall not compel
any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are
otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance. – A regional school shall schedule
recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4, on a daily
basis within one hour of the beginning of the instructional day. A regional
school shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the
Pledge of Allegiance."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 116-69.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-69.1. Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance.
The school shall (i) display the United States and North Carolina flags in each classroom
when available, (ii) require the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, Pledge of
Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4, be scheduled on a daily basis within one hour of the
beginning of the instructional day, and (iii) provide instruction on the meaning and historical
origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. The school shall not compel any person to stand,
salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available,
flags shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 116-235(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) The Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags and the Recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance. – The Board of Trustees shall adopt policies to require (i) the display of
the United States and North Carolina flags in each classroom when available, (ii) the recitation
of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, Pledge of Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4, be
scheduled on a daily basis within one hour of the beginning of the instructional day, and (iii) the
instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. These
policies shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance.
If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance. – Laboratory schools shall schedule recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4, on a daily basis within one
hour of the beginning of the instructional day."

PART II. REQUIRE RECITATION OF PLEDGE OF ALLEGIANCE AT STATE
BOARD OF EDUCATION AND GOVERNING BODY MEETINGS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-11. Organization and internal procedures of Board.
…
(b) Regular Meetings of Board. – The regular meetings of the Board shall be held each
month on a day certain, as determined by the Board. The Board shall determine the hour of the
meeting, which may be adjourned from day to day, or to a day certain, until the business before
the Board has been completed.
(b1) Annual meeting with the State Board of Community Colleges and the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina. Carolina. – The State Board of Education shall
meet with the State Board of Community Colleges and the Board of Governors of The University
of North Carolina at least once a year to discuss educational matters of mutual interest and to
Page 2 House Bill 186-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
recommend to the General Assembly such policies as are appropriate to encourage the
improvement of public education at every level in this State. The meeting in 1987 and every three
years thereafter shall be hosted by the University Board of Governors, the meeting in 1988 and
every three years thereafter shall be hosted by the State Board of Education, and the meeting in
1989 and every three years thereafter shall be hosted by the State Board of Community Colleges.
(b2) Pledge of Allegiance. – Every regular and special meeting of the Board shall begin
with recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4. This policy shall not
compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) Article 7B of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-76.300. Pledge of Allegiance.
Every meeting of a governing body of a public school unit shall begin with recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance, as codified in 4 U.S.C. § 4. This policy shall not compel any person to
stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 186-Second Edition Page 3